Illinois, session 104th, HB3513.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5On-Premise Cannabis Consumption Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Cannabis" has the meaning given to that term in Section 81-10 of the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act.9    "Cannabis business establishment" has the meaning given to 10that term in Section 1-10 of the Cannabis Regulation and Tax.11    "Cannabis hospitality venue" means a public or private 12restaurant, bar, or other business licensed under Section 15 13that allows communal consumption of cannabis or 14cannabis-infused products on premises.15    "Cannabis-infused product" has the meaning given to that 16term in Section 1-10 of the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act.17    "Cannabis paraphernalia" has the meaning given to that 18term in Section 1-10 of the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act.19    "Governmental unit" means a county or municipality.20    "Venue" means any business establishment licensed by a 21governmental unit for hospitality-related business. 22    Section 10. Temporary event permits.   HB3513- 2 -LRB104 10826 BDA 20907 b1    (a) The hosting of a temporary event for the consumption 2of cannabis or cannabis-infused products at a venue not 3licensed as a cannabis hospitality venue is subject to 4regulation by a municipality for events within the 5municipality and by a county for events outside of a 6municipality.7    (b) A temporary event including the consumption of 8cannabis or cannabis-infused products must hold a temporary 9event permit issued by the governmental unit for the premises 10at which the temporary event is conducted.11    (c) An applicant for a temporary event permit under this 12Section and the premises where it shall be conducted must meet 13the requirements of any ordinance passed or adopted by the 14governmental unit under this subsection.15        (1) Before a governmental unit may issue any temporary 16    event permits under this Section, the governmental unit 17    must adopt an ordinance that includes all of the 18    following:19            (A) application and permit fees for a permit 20        issued under this Section;21            (B) maximum term of a permit issued under this 22        section; and23            (C) a requirement that each permit application 24        includes plans detailing:25                (i) the date, time of operation, and address 26            of the location hosting the consumption event;  HB3513- 3 -LRB104 10826 BDA 20907 b1                (ii) how smoke, aerosols, and vapors from 2            cannabis consumption will be ventilated in indoor 3            consumption spaces;4                (iii) how consumption will be obscured from 5            view by opaque or translucent walls, fences, 6            hedges, or other barriers in outdoor spaces; and7                (iv) how individuals under 21 will be 8            prevented from entering the consumption space.9        (2) The governmental unit may not adopt an ordinance 10    or rule that:11            (A) prohibits a person who holds a permit issued 12        under this Section from adopting policies that allow 13        attendees of temporary events to bring their own 14        cannabis, cannabis-infused products, or cannabis 15        paraphernalia into a temporary event; 16            (B) prohibits the preparation and sale of food and 17        non-alcoholic beverages at venues already licensed for 18        such sales by the governmental unit; or19            (C) imposes public health or safety standards if 20        those standards serve no purpose other than deterring 21        the organization and execution of temporary events.22    (d) The premises at which an applicant intends to conduct 23the event may not be located within 500 feet of a primary or 24secondary school.25    (e) An applicant for a temporary event permit under this 26Section must apply for the permit in the manner required by   HB3513- 4 -LRB104 10826 BDA 20907 b1ordinance of the governmental unit.2    (f) Permit fees assessed under this Section must be 3reasonably related to the cost of inspecting and regulating 4the temporary event. 5    Section 15. Cannabis hospitality venues.6    (a) The consumption of cannabis or cannabis-infused 7products at a cannabis hospitality venue is subject to 8regulation by a municipality for cannabis hospitality venues 9within the municipality and by a county for cannabis 10hospitality venues outside of a municipality.11    (b) A person operating a cannabis hospitality venue must 12hold a cannabis hospitality venue license issued by the 13governmental unit for the premises at which the consumption 14occurs.15    (c) The premises at which an applicant intends to have a 16cannabis hospitality venue may not be located within 500 feet 17of a public or private elementary or secondary school.18    (d) An applicant for a cannabis hospitality venue license 19under this Section and the premises at which the cannabis 20hospitality venue is to be located must meet the requirements 21of any ordinance adopted by the governmental unit under this 22subsection.23        (1) The ordinance must include all of the following:24            (A) a requirement that a person who holds a 25        license must renew the license annually;  HB3513- 5 -LRB104 10826 BDA 20907 b1            (B) fees for the application, licensure, and 2        renewal of licensure for a license under this Section;3            (C) a restriction on the consumption of cannabis 4        or cannabis-infused products to designated areas of a 5        premises for which a license has been issued under 6        this Section;7            (D) a requirement that each portion of a premises 8        for which a license has been issued under this Section 9        where cannabis or cannabis-infused products are 10        smoked, aerosolized, or vaporized must have:11                (i) a ventilation system for any indoor 12            consumption areas that exhausts smoke, aerosols, 13            and vapors from that portion of the premises; 14                (ii) is designed and terminated in accordance 15            with building code standards for the applicable 16            occupancy classification; and17                (iii) for any outdoor consumption area, it 18            must be surrounded by a sight-obscuring wall, 19            fence, hedge, or other opaque or translucent 20            barrier; the outdoor consumption space may be 21            located closer than 15 feet from an entrance or 22            exit of the cannabis hospitality venue so long as 23            the outdoor consumption space is not obstructing 24            the venue's primary public entry point or is 25            located on a public way.26            (F) a requirement that a premises for which a   HB3513- 6 -LRB104 10826 BDA 20907 b1        license has been issued under this Section must meet 2        any public health and safety standards and industry 3        best practices established by the governmental unit by 4        rule or ordinance;5            (G) a requirement that premises for which this 6        license be issued have a designated smoke free area so 7        employees of the facility can be isolated from 8        cannabis smoke, vapor, and aerosols;9            (H) a requirement that premises for which this 10        license be issued have a plan in place to prevent 11        patrons under the age of 21 from accessing the 12        consumption space; and13            (I) a requirement that licensees which qualify for 14        Social Equity Applicant status found in the Cannabis 15        Tax and Regulation Act have their licensing costs 16        refunded.17        (2) The governmental unit may not adopt an ordinance 18    or rule that:19            (A) prohibits a person who holds a license issued 20        under this Section from adopting policies that allow 21        persons attending the cannabis hospitality venue to 22        bring cannabis, cannabis-infused products, or cannabis 23        paraphernalia into the club; 24            (B) imposes public health or safety standards on 25        cannabis hospitality venues if those standards serve 26        no purpose other than deterring the consumption of   HB3513- 7 -LRB104 10826 BDA 20907 b1        cannabis or cannabis-infused products at the cannabis 2        hospitality venue; or3            (C) prohibits the lawful preparation and sale of 4        food and beverage or the lawful sale or rental of 5        cannabis related paraphernalia so long as the cannabis 6        hospitality venue is appropriately licensed and in 7        compliance for such activities.8    (f) License fees assessed under this Section must be 9reasonably related to the cost of inspecting and regulating 10the cannabis hospitality venue.11    (g) Municipalities may choose to prohibit cannabis 12hospitality venues from serving alcoholic beverages.13    (h) Outside of areas defined by Section 10 and Section 15 14of this act, a municipality may allow the use of cannabis in 15places tobacco use is permitted by the Smoke Free Illinois 16Act. 17    Section 20. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate or 18license temporary events or cannabis hospitality venues in a 19manner inconsistent with this Act. This Act is a limitation 20under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the 21Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule 22units of powers and functions exercised by the State. 23    Section 90. The Smoke Free Illinois Act is amended by 24changing Section 35 as follows:   HB3513- 8 -LRB104 10826 BDA 20907 b1    (410 ILCS 82/35)2    Sec. 35. Exemptions. Notwithstanding any other provision 3of this Act, smoking is allowed in the following areas:4        (1) Private residences or dwelling places, except when 5    used as a child care, adult day care, or healthcare 6    facility or any other home-based business open to the 7    public.8        (2) Retail tobacco stores as defined in Section 10 of 9    this Act in operation prior to January 1, 2008 (the 10    effective date of Public Act 95-17). The retail tobacco 11    store shall annually file with the Department by January 12    31st an affidavit stating the percentage of its gross 13    income during the prior calendar year that was derived 14    from the sale of loose tobacco, plants, or herbs and 15    cigars, cigarettes, pipes, or other smoking devices for 16    smoking tobacco and related smoking accessories. Any 17    retail tobacco store that begins operation after January 18    1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-17) may only 19    qualify for an exemption if located in a freestanding 20    structure occupied solely by the business and smoke from 21    the business does not migrate into an enclosed area where 22    smoking is prohibited. A retail tobacco store that derives 23    at least 80% of its gross revenue from the sale of 24    electronic cigarettes and electronic cigarette equipment 25    and accessories in operation before January 1, 2024 (the   HB3513- 9 -LRB104 10826 BDA 20907 b1    effective date of Public Act 103-272) qualifies for this 2    exemption for electronic cigarettes only. A retail tobacco 3    store claiming an exemption for electronic cigarettes 4    shall annually file with the Department by January 31 an 5    affidavit stating the percentage of its gross income 6    during the prior calendar year that was derived from the 7    sale of electronic cigarettes. A retail tobacco store may, 8    with authorization or permission from a unit of local 9    government, including a home rule unit, or any non-home 10    rule county within the unincorporated territory of the 11    county, allow the on-premises consumption of cannabis in 12    specially designated areas.13        (3) (Blank).14        (4) Hotel and motel sleeping rooms that are rented to 15    guests and are designated as smoking rooms, provided that 16    all smoking rooms on the same floor must be contiguous and 17    smoke from these rooms must not infiltrate into nonsmoking 18    rooms or other areas where smoking is prohibited. Not more 19    than 25% of the rooms rented to guests in a hotel or motel 20    may be designated as rooms where smoking is allowed. The 21    status of rooms as smoking or nonsmoking may not be 22    changed, except to permanently add additional nonsmoking 23    rooms. Hotel and motel establishments may also apply and 24    be licensed under the provisions of the On-Premise 25    Cannabis Consumption Act and may host consumption events 26    as detailed in that Act.   HB3513- 10 -LRB104 10826 BDA 20907 b1        (5) Enclosed laboratories that are excluded from the 2    definition of "place of employment" in Section 10 of this 3    Act. Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1029, 4    if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 5    accordance with all provisions of the Illinois 6    Administrative Procedure Act and all rules and procedures 7    of the Joint Committee on Administrative Rules; any 8    purported rule not so adopted, for whatever reason, is 9    unauthorized.10        (6) Common smoking rooms in long-term care facilities 11    operated under the authority of the Illinois Department of 12    Veterans' Affairs or licensed under the Nursing Home Care 13    Act that are accessible only to residents who are smokers 14    and have requested in writing to have access to the common 15    smoking room where smoking is permitted and the smoke 16    shall not infiltrate other areas of the long-term care 17    facility. Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 18    95-1029, if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted 19    in accordance with all provisions of the Illinois 20    Administrative Procedure Act and all rules and procedures 21    of the Joint Committee on Administrative Rules; any 22    purported rule not so adopted, for whatever reason, is 23    unauthorized.24        (7) A convention hall of the Donald E. Stephens 25    Convention Center where a meeting or trade show for 26    manufacturers and suppliers of tobacco and tobacco   HB3513- 11 -LRB104 10826 BDA 20907 b1    products and accessories is being held, during the time 2    the meeting or trade show is occurring, if the meeting or 3    trade show:4            (i) is a trade-only event and not open to the 5        public;6            (ii) is limited to attendees and exhibitors that 7        are 21 years of age or older;8            (iii) is being produced or organized by a business 9        relating to tobacco or a professional association for 10        convenience stores; and11            (iv) involves the display of tobacco products.12        Smoking is not allowed in any public area outside of 13    the hall designated for the meeting or trade show.14        This paragraph (7) is inoperative on and after October 15    1, 2015.16        (8) A dispensing organization, as defined in the 17    Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act, authorized or permitted 18    by a unit local government to allow on-site consumption of 19    cannabis, if the establishment: (1) maintains a specially 20    designated area or areas for the purpose of heating, 21    burning, smoking, or lighting cannabis; (2) is limited to 22    individuals 21 or older; and (3) maintains a locked door 23    or barrier to any specially designated areas for the 24    purpose of heating, burning, smoking or lighting cannabis. 25        (9) Temporary events or cannabis hospitality venues 26    licensed under the On-Premise Cannabis Consumption Act.   HB3513- 12 -LRB104 10826 BDA 20907 b1(Source: P.A. 103-272, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.